Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,110
Disposal of low-level radioactive waste; license required.

It shall be unlawful for any person to dispose of low-level radioactive waste unless licensed by the department pursuant to the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Disposal Act.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 33.